Utah statutes.
63G-6-507 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Form of bonds -- Effect of certified copy.

The form of the bonds required by this part shall be established by rules and regulations.  Any person may obtain from the state a certified copy of a bond upon payment of the cost of reproduction of the bond and postage, if any.  A certified copy of a bond shall be prima facie evidence of the contents, execution, and delivery of the original.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

